Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2313
Corporation; nonprofit.

The corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm, or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors determines that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds, and other obligations of the corporation, any net earnings of the corporation thereafter accruing shall be paid to the local political subdivision with respect to which the corporation was organized.

Laws 1972, LB 1517, § 14;

Laws 1995, LB 494, § 13.